Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.52.035

Negotiations reduced to written agreements—Provisions relating to salary increases—Restrictions.

(1) At the conclusion of any negotiation processes as provided for in RCW 28B.52.030, any matter upon which the parties have reached agreement shall be reduced to writing and acted upon in a regular or special meeting of the boards of trustees, and become part of the official proceedings of said board meeting. Except as provided in this section, provisions of written contracts relating to salary increases shall not exceed the amount or percentage established by the legislature in the appropriations act and allocated to the board of trustees by the state board for community and technical colleges.

(2) The written agreement acted upon by a board of trustees must be submitted to the director of the office of financial management by October 1 prior to the fiscal year in which the provisions of the agreement go into effect. The length of term of any such agreement shall be for not more than three fiscal years. If any provision of a salary increase is changed by subsequent modification of the appropriations act by the legislature, both parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for the sole purpose of arriving at a mutually agreed upon replacement for the modified provision. A board of trustees may provide additional compensation to academic employees that exceeds that provided by the legislature.

[ 2018 c 267 s 2; 1991 c 238 s 148; 1987 c 314 s 4; 1973 1st ex.s. c 205 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 205: See note following RCW 28B.52.020.